Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SPECIAL LIQUOR LAW; CITY OF BRAINERD.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law, ordinance, or charter provision to the contrary, the city of Brainerd may issue an intoxicating liquor license to the Northern Pacific Center, located at 1511 Northern Pacific Road. A license issued under this section allows sales on all days of the week to persons attending events at the center, and may be issued for a space that is not compact and contiguous, provided that the premises are described in the approved license. All other provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 340A, not inconsistent with this section apply to a license issued under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Brainerd City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end